Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-885.46
License or certificate under prior
law; renewal.

Any real estate license or subdivision certificate
issued prior to September 2, 1973, shall, for purposes of renewal, be considered
to have been originally issued under the Nebraska Real Estate License Act.

Laws 1973, LB 68, § 46;

Laws 1983, LB 182, § 30;

Laws 2009, LB30, § 13.